en: Pot noodles
de: Topf-Nudeln
es: Fideos en taza
fr: Box de nouilles
hr: Lonac rezanci
it: Noodles in tazza
nl: Noedle dozen

en: Pastries, pastry
ca: Pastisseria
da: Bagværk
de: Gebäck
es: Bolleria
fi: leivokset
fr: Pâtisseries, pâtisserie
he: מאפים
hr: Slastičarnice
it: Prodotti di pasticceria
ja: ペイストリー, ペストリー
nl: Gebak
pt: Pastéis
ru: Мучные изделия
sv: Bakverk
tr: Hamur işi
zh: 糕点

en: Strudels
de: Strudel
fr: Strudels
hr: Savijače
it: Strudel
nl: Strudel

en: Runeberg torte
fi: Runebergintorttu
hr: Runeberg torta
sv: Runebergstårta

xx: Succès
fr: Succès

en: Oatmeal balls, Chocolate balls
da: Havregrynskugler
nb: Havregrynskuler
sv: Chokladbollar, Kokosbollar, Havrebollar

en: Punsch-rolls
de: Dammsugare, Punschrullen
sv: Punschrullar, Dammsugare, Arraksrullar, 150-ohmare

en: Rum balls
ar: كرات الروم
az: Kartof şirniyyatı
be: Бульба (дэсерт)
ca: Boles de rom
cs: Rumové koule
da: Romkugler, Trøfler (wienerbrød), Trøffelkugler
de: Rumkugeln
eo: Rumpilkoj
es: Bola de ron
ga: Liathróidí rum
hy: Կարտոֆիլ
is: Rommkúlur
it: Tartufo al rum
ja: ラムボール
jv: Bal rum
lt: Romo kamuoliukai
nb: Romkuler
nn: Romkuler
pl: Bajadera
ru: Ромовые шарики
sv: Rombollar
uk: Картопля (тістечко)
yi: רום באַללס
zh: 朗姆酒球

en: Churros
xx: Churros
bg: Чурос
ja: チュロス

en: Biscuit with milk
fr: Biscuit sec au lait

en: Biscuits with nuts
de: Nusskekse
es: Galletas con nueces
fr: Biscuits fourrés aux noix
hr: Keksi s orasima
it: Biscotti alle noci
nl: Koekjes met noten

en: Biscuit filled with fruit paste, Biscuit filled with fruit puree
fr: Biscuits sec fourré à la pâte de fruits, Biscuit sec fourré à la purée de fruits

en: Snack biscuit with fruits filling, Snack biscuit filled with fruits
fr: Goûter sec fourré parfum fruits, Goûter sec sandwiché parfum fruits

en: Chocolate-covered biscuits, Biscuit with chocolate covering, Cookie with chocolate covering, Chocolate covered biscuit
fr: Biscuits nappés de chocolat, Biscuits nappés au chocolat, Biscuits avec nappage au chocolat, Biscuit sec avec nappage au chocolat
hr: Biskvit s čokoladnim preljevom
nl: Chocoladekoekje, Koekje met chocolade, Chocolade bedekt koekje
pt: Bolacha com cobertura de chocolate, Biscoito com cobertura de chocolate, Bolacha coberta de chocolate
ru: Печенье с шоколадной глазурью, Печенье с шоколадной оболочкой, Печенье с шоколадной крошкой
tr: Çikolata kaplı bisküvi, Çikolata kaplı kurabiye

en: Crispy biscuits
de: Knusprige Kekse
es: Galletas crujientes
fr: Biscuits croustillants
hr: Prhki keksići

en: Diet crispy biscuit
fr: Biscuit sec croquant allégé en matière grasse

en: Crispy biscuit with reduced-fat chocolate, Crispy cookie with reduced-fat chocolate
fr: Biscuit sec croquant au chocolat allégé en matière grasse

en: Cone wafer for ice cream
es: Barquillo para helado
fr: Cône pour glace, Cornet pour glace
hr: Kornet oblatna za sladoled
it: Cialda per gelato
ja: アイスクリーム・コーン
nl: Hoorntje voor ijs

en: Thin biscuits with fruits
fr: Biscuits secs aux fruits, tuiles aux fruits

en: Fruit biscuits
de: Fruchtkekse
es: Galletas de frutas
fr: Biscuits aux fruits
hr: Voćni keksi
it: Biscotti alla frutta
nl: Vruchtenbiscuits